Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.190

False personation.

Every person filing for record, or attempting to file for record, the certificate issued to another, falsely claiming himself or herself to be the person named in such certificate, or falsely claiming himself or herself to be the person entitled to the same, is guilty of forgery under RCW 9A.60.020.

[ 2003 c 53 s 138; 1909 c 192 s 16; RRS s 10019.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

False personation in the first or second degree: RCW 9A.60.040, 9A.60.045.